da: Kontorforsyning > Kontorredskaber: Klokker; Skriveplader med klemme; Brevåbnere; Forstørrelsesglas; Kontorstempler; Blyantspidsere; Hæfteklammefjernere; Hæftemaskiner; Tapedispensere; Skrive- og tegneredskaber – tilbehør; Skrive- og tegneredskaber
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Akcesoria biurowe: Dzwonki recepcyjne; Podkładki do pisania; Noże do papieru; Szkła powiększające; Pieczątki biurowe; Temperówki; Rozszywacze; Zszywacze; Podajniki na taśmę klejącą; Akcesoria do przyborów piśmienniczych i rysunkowych; Przybory piśmiennicze i rysunkowe
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Όργανα γραφείου: Κουδούνι κλήσης; Πινακίδες με κλιπ; Ανοιχτήρια φακέλων; Μεγεθυντικοί φακοί; Σφραγίδες γραφείου; Ξύστρες μολυβιών; Μηχανήματα αφαίρεσης συρραπτικών; Συρραπτικά; Διανομείς ταινίας; Αξεσουάρ γραφικών & σχεδιαστικών οργάνων; Όργανα γραφής & σχεδίασης
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Kancelářské nástroje: Zvonky; Záznamové desky; Otvírače na dopisy; Lupy; Kancelářská razítka; Ořezávátka; Odstraňovače sešití; Sešívačky; Dávkovače pásky; Psací potřeby – příslušenství; Psací potřeby
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Instrumentos de escritório: Sinetas; Pranchetas; Abridores de carta; Lupas; Carimbos de escritório; Apontadores; Removedores de grampos; Grampeadores; Suporte para fita adesiva; Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita; Instrumentos de escrita
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > เครื่องมือสำนักงาน: กระดิ่ง; คลิปบอร์ด; ที่เปิดจดหมาย; แว่นขยาย; ตราประทับในสำนักงาน; เครื่องเหลาดินสอ; ที่ดึงลวดเย็บกระดาษ; ที่เย็บกระดาษ; แท่นตัดสก๊อตเทป; อุปกรณ์การเขียนและการวาด; อุปกรณ์วาดเขียน
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Biuro instrumentai: Iškvietimo skambučiai; Iškarpinės; Peiliai vokams; Didinamieji stiklai; Biuro antspaudai; Pieštukų drožtukai; Kabių šalinimo prietaisai; Segikliai; Lipniosios juostos dalytuvai; Rašymo ir piešimo priemonių priedai; Rašymo ir piešimo priemonės
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Accessoires de bureau: Sonnettes de comptoir; Bloc-notes; Coupe-papier; Loupes; Timbres de bureau; Taille-crayons; Dégrafeuses; Agrafeuses; Dérouleurs de ruban adhésif; Accessoires pour instruments d’écriture; Instruments d’écriture et de dessin
ko: 사무용품 > 사무기구: 호출벨; 클립보드; 편지 개봉기; 확대경; 사무용 도장; 연필깎이; 제침기; 스테이플러; 테이프 디스펜서; 필기/제도 용구; 필기구/제도용구
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Офисные принадлежности: Сигнальные звонки; Планшеты; Ножи для вскрытия конвертов; Лупы; Офисные штампы и печати; Точилки для карандашей; Антистеплеры; Степлеры; Диспенсеры для клейкой ленты; Аксессуары для письменных принадлежностей; Письменные принадлежности
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Kontorsinstrument: Ringklockor; Skrivplattor; Brevöppnare; Förstoringsglas; Kontorsstämplar; Pennvässare; Klammerborttagare; Häftapparater; Tejphållare; Tillbehör till skriv- och ritinstrument; Skriv- och ritinstrument
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pisarniški pripomočki: Zvonci za klicanje; Pisalne plošče; Pisemski noži; Lupe; Pisarniški žigi; Šilčki za svinčnike; Razpenjači; Spenjači; Podajalci za lepilne trakove; Dodatki za pisala in risala; Pisalna in risalna orodja
nb: Kontormateriell > Kontorinstrumenter: Ringeklokker; Skriveplater; Brevåpnere; Forstørrelsesglass; Kontorstempler; Blyantspissere; Stiftefjernere; Stiftemaskiner; Tapedispensere; Tilbehør til skrive- og tegneinstrumenter; Skrive- og tegneinstrumenter
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 事務用品: 呼叫鈴; 文件夾板; 拆信刀; 放大鏡; 辦公室印章; 削鉛筆器; 除針器; 釘書機; 膠台; 書寫/繪畫用具配件; 書寫/繪畫用具
ja: オフィス用品 > 事務用品: 呼び鈴; クリップボード; レターオープナー・ペーパーナイフ; 虫眼鏡・ルーペ; 事務用スタンプ; 鉛筆削り; ホッチキス針リムーバー; ホッチキス; テープカッター; 筆記具用インク・替芯; 筆記用具
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Dụng cụ văn phòng: Chuông gọi; Kẹp trình ký; Dụng cụ mở thư; Kính lúp; Con dấu văn phòng; Gọt bút chì; Dụng cụ tháo ghim; Dập ghim; Dụng cụ cắt băng keo; Phụ kiện dụng cũ viết và vẽ; Dụng cụ vẽ và viết
hu: Irodai kellékek > Irodai eszközök: Hívócsengők; Vágólapok; Levélbontók; Nagyítók; Irodai bélyegzők; Ceruzahegyezők; Tűzőkapocs-eltávolítók; Tűzőgépek; Szalagadagolók; Író- és rajzeszköz-kiegészítők; Író- és rajzeszközök
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Instrumente de birou: Clopoței sonerie; Mape clipboard; Cuțite pentru scrisori; Lupe; Ștampile de birou; Ascuțitori creion; Decapsatoare; Capsatoare; Distribuitoare bandă; Accesorii pentru instrumente de scris și desen; Instrumente de scris și desen
de: Bürobedarf > Büroarbeitsmittel: Tischglocken; Klemmbretter; Brieföffner; Lupen; Bürostempel; Bleistiftspitzer; Heftklammernzieher; Heftgeräte; Klebebandabroller; Schreibwerkzeugzubehör; Schreibgeräte
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Офис инструменти: Метални звънци; Клипбордове; Инструменти за отваряне на писма; Лупи; Офис печати; Острилки за моливи; Средства за отстраняване на телбод; Телбоди; Диспенсъри за тиксо; Аксесоари за инструменти за писане и рисуване; Инструменти за писане и рисуване
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Kancelárske nástroje: Privolávacie zvončeky; Dosky s klipom; Otvárače listov; Lupy; Kancelárske pečiatky; Orezávače ceruziek; Odstraňovače sponiek; Zošívačky; Dávkovače pásky; Príslušenstvo pre písacie a kresliace potreby; Písacie a kresliace potreby
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Uredski uređaji: Zvona za recepciju; Podlošci za pisanje; Otvarači pisama; Povećala; Uredski pečati; Šiljila; Deklamerica; Klamerice; Dozatori za trake; Dodaci za pribor za pisanje i crtanje; Pribor za pisanje i crtanje
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Toimistovälineet: Soittokellot; Kirjoituslevyt; Kirjeenavaajat; Suurennuslasit; Toimistoleimasimet; Kynän teroittimet; Niitinpoistajat; Nitojat; Teippikoneet; Kirjoitus- ja piirustusvälineiden lisätarvikkeet; Kirjoitus- ja piirustusvälineet
en: Office Supplies > Office Instruments: Call Bells; Clipboards; Letter Openers; Magnifiers; Office Stamps; Pencil Sharpeners; Staple Removers; Staplers; Tape Dispensers; Writing & Drawing Instrument Accessories; Writing & Drawing Instruments
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 办公文具: 呼叫铃; 剪贴板; 拆信刀; 放大镜; 办公章; 卷笔刀; 起钉器; 订书机; 胶带座; 书写/绘图工具配件; 书写/绘图工具
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Ofis Aletleri: Çağrı Zilleri; Klipsli Kağıt Altlıkları; Mektup Açacakları; Büyüteçler; Ofis Pulları; Kalemtıraşlar; Zımba Teli Sökücüler; Zımbalar; Bant Kesiciler; Yazım ve Çizim Aleti Aksesuarları; Yazım ve Çizim Aletleri
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Material de escritório: Campainhas de chamada; Pranchetas; Abre-cartas; Lupas; Carimbos de escritório; Afia-lápis; Removedores de agrafos; Agrafadores; Suportes para fita-cola; Acessórios para instrumentos de escrita e desenho; Instrumentos de escrita e desenho
it: Forniture per ufficio > Strumenti per ufficio: Campanelli di chiamata; Portablocco; Aprilettere; Lenti di ingrandimento; Francobolli per ufficio; Temperamatite; Pinze rimuovigraffette; Graffettatrici; Dispenser per nastro adesivo; Accessori strumenti per scrivere; Strumenti per scrivere e disegnare
es: Material de oficina > Artículos de oficina: Timbres de recepción; Portapapeles; Abridores de cartas; Lupas; Sellos de oficina; Sacapuntas; Quitagrapas; Grapadoras; Dispensadores de celofán; Accesorios para escritura y dibujo; Artículos de escritura y dibujo
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Kantoorbenodigdheden: Baliebellen; Klemborden; Briefopeners; Vergrootglazen; Kantoorstempels; Puntenslijpers; Nietjesverwijderaar; Nietapparaten; Plakbandhouders; Accessoires voor schrijfinstrumenten; Schrijfinstrumenten